District of Columbia statutes.
8-1712

Limitations on authority.

Nothing in this subchapter shall authorize the Soil and Water Conservation District, any of its members, or any of its employees to obligate, encumber, pledge, necessitate, or require the Soil and Water Conservation District or the District of Columbia government to perform, execute, or to take any action subsequent to January 1, 1987. Any property, materials, equipment, land, money, records, or any other asset of the Soil and Water Conservation District shall become the possession of the District of Columbia government on January 2, 1987.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-143, § 13, 29 DCR 3118

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2812.